California statutes. Education Code
(4) How the local educational agency will measure outcomes associated with the activities specified in subdivision (e) and metrics reported in the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan.

(b) An application shall be for three years of grant funding. Consistent with the provisions of this article, the department may establish requirements for grantees to meet at the end of the first and second years of funding in order to receive funding for the remaining grant period.

(c) The department shall determine eligibility for grants and the distribution of grant funding based on all of the following factors:

(1) Pupil and school needs the local
 educational agency will address with the grant funds.

(2) Number of pupils to be served with the grant funds.

(3) Number, size, and type of participating schools within the local educational agency.

(4) Any challenges the local educational agency experiences in building capacity for fulfilling the purposes of this article.

(5) The unique characteristics of small school districts, given their challenges with economies of scale and access to services in rural locations.

(d) (1) Before the initial application deadline, the department shall conduct targeted outreach to local educational agencies that are likely to be given priority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 33432 and shall offer the local educational agencies technical assistance as they develop their grant applications.

(2) The department may provide technical assistance with application development to any local educational agency that requests assistance. This may include assistance from external entities the department may contract with as part of the training and technical assistance structure established pursuant to Section 33433.

(e) The department shall issue application guidelines that include, at a minimum, information about the department’s plans for overall evaluation of the program considering the objectives identified in Section 33434. For purposes of facilitating program evaluation, the department, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, shall identify a set of measures and associated data sources that are deemed valid and reliable for measuring
 pupil and school outcomes and assessing the benefits of the program.

(f) In meeting the requirements of this section, the department shall consult with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of local educational agencies, teachers and other school personnel, parents, advocacy organizations with experience working with target vulnerable populations, and parent- and youth-serving community-based organizations. It the intent of the Legislature that stakeholders provide input to the department on the design of the application and review process, including the size of the grant awards. The stakeholders shall not be involved in determining who will be awarded grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (SB 527)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.)
-------------------------------------------

33432.

(a) A local educational agency that receives a grant shall use the grant funds for planning, implementation, and evaluation of activities in support of evidence-based, nonpunitive programs and practices to keep the state’s most vulnerable pupils in school. These activities shall complement or enhance the actions and services identified to meet the local educational agency’s goals as identified in its local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 47606.5, 52060, or 52066, as applicable. These activities may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Establishing a community school, as defined in Section 33435.

(2) Implementing activities or programs to improve attendance and reduce chronic absenteeism, including, but not limited to, early warning systems or early intervention programs.

(3) Implementing restorative practices, restorative justice models, or other programs to improve retention rates, reduce suspensions and other school removals, and reduce the referral of pupils to law enforcement agencies.

(4) Implementing activities that advance social-emotional learning, positive behavior interventions and supports, culturally responsive practices, and trauma-informed strategies.

(5) Establishing partnerships with community-based organizations or other relevant entities to support the implementation of evidence-based, nonpunitive approaches to further the goals of the program.

(6) Adding or increasing staff within a local educational agency whose primary purpose is to address ongoing chronic attendance problems, including, but not necessarily limited to, conducting outreach to families and children currently, or at risk of becoming, chronically truant.

(b) In selecting grant recipients pursuant to this article, the department shall give priority to a local educational agency that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) (A) Has a high rate of chronic absenteeism, out-of-school suspension, or school dropout for the general pupil population or for a numerically significant pupil subgroup, as identified in a local control and accountability plan pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 52052.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “high rate” means a rate that exceeds the state average.

(2) Is located in a community with a high crime rate.

(3) Has a significant representation of foster youth among its pupil enrollment.

(c) A local educational agency that receives a grant shall provide a local contribution of matching expenditures equal to at least 20 percent of the total grant award. This local contribution can be from cash expenditures or in-kind contributions. A local educational agency is encouraged to exceed the 20-percent match requirement to enable the local educational agency to sustain the activities or programs established under this article beyond the three-year grant period.

(d) A local educational agency that receives a
 grant shall use the grant funds to increase or improve services that the local educational agency currently provides for purposes specified in this article.

(e) A local educational agency shall not use grant funds to pay for law enforcement activities, including personnel or equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (SB 527)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.)
-------------------------------------------

33433.

(a) The department shall use the funding the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Act authorizes for administrative costs pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7599.2 of the Government Code, which is no more than 5 percent of the annual funding the department receives from the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Fund, for the administrative costs of implementing this article, including, but not limited to, administering grant awards, coordinating the training and technical assistance structure described in subdivision (b), and completing the evaluation pursuant to Section 33434.

(b) The department shall establish a structure to deliver training and technical assistance to grantees using regional workshops and
 technical assistance providers that have expertise on pupil engagement, school climate, truancy reduction, and supporting pupils who are at risk of dropping out of school or who are victims of crime. The department may contract with those providers to assist the grantees as well as to serve as a resource for other local educational agencies that may use their own funding sources to engage in this community of practice. Technical assistance provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the technical assistance provided to a local educational agency by the county superintendent of schools or the Superintendent, as appropriate, in the development of the local control and accountability plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (SB 527)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.)
-------------------------------------------

33435.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Community school” means a public school that participates in a community-based effort to coordinate and integrate educational, developmental, family, health, and other comprehensive services through community-based organizations and public and private partnerships with one or more community partners for the delivery of community services that may be provided at a schoolsite to pupils, families, and community members.

(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (SB 527)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.)
-------------------------------------------

33436.

This article shall not become operative unless funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act or another statute to the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Fund in accordance with the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Act for the purposes specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (SB 527)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: Operational condition applies to Article 10, commencing with Section 33430.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Pathways to Success Grant Program [33440. - 33447.]

33440.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “English learner” has the same meaning as defined in Section 306.

(b) “Native speaker of English” has the same meaning as defined in Section 306.

(c) “Dual language immersion program” is a program that enrolls both English learners and native speakers of English and provides integrated language learning and academic instruction for native speakers of English and native speakers of another language, with the goals of high academic achievement, first and second language proficiency, and cross-cultural understanding. These programs are also known as two-way
 bilingual immersion programs.

(d) “Developmental bilingual program for English learners” is a program in which academic instruction and literacy development occurs in both a pupil’s home language and in English. It is a program that exists across all grade levels in schools. Academic curriculum is taught through a pupil’s home language plus English language development, with increasing academic instruction in English until pupils develop literacy in both languages, at which point academic study in both languages continues.

(e) “Early learning dual language learners
 programs” refer to language programs in early care and education settings that serve children from birth to five years of age before entry into kindergarten. These programs include, but are not necessarily limited to, preschool, expanded transitional kindergarten, and transitional kindergarten, where the goal is to support development of both languages and to promote bilingualism and biliteracy.

(f) “Dual language learners” (DLLs) is the term used in early education to refer to children from birth to age five who are learning two or more languages at the same time, or who are learning a second language, such as English, while continuing to develop their home language.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33441.

(a) The Pathways to Success Grant Program is hereby established with the goal of providing pupils in preschool, transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, with dual language immersion programs, developmental bilingual programs for English learners, or early learning dual language learners programs that are consistent with the adopted state policy of the English Learner Roadmap.

(b) The purpose of the Pathways to Success Grant Program is to grow capacity for high-quality dual language learning by doing all of the following:

(1) Establishing dual language immersion programs or developmental bilingual programs for English learners for pupils in elementary
 and secondary schools.

(2) Establishing early learning dual language learners programs in state preschools operated by school districts and charter schools.

(3) Expanding existing dual language immersion programs or developmental bilingual programs for English learners to new schoolsites.

(4) Providing professional development modules to school districts, schools, county offices of education, or a consortium of these entities, with evidence-based, demonstrated professional development techniques on how to design and implement new, or to expand existing, dual language immersion programs or developmental bilingual programs for English learners and early learning dual language
 learners programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33442.

(a) (1) The department shall administer the Pathways to Success Grant Program, which shall be a three-year grant program. Commencing September 1, 2019, the department shall award a minimum of 10 one-time grants of up to three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per grant, to entities described in subdivision (b) considering any of the following:

 (A) Establishing a dual language immersion program or developmental bilingual program for English learners.

(B) Expanding an established dual language immersion program or developmental bilingual program for English learners.

(C) Establishing early
 learning dual language learners programs in state preschool programs operated by school districts and charter schools.

(2) When awarding a grant to an applicant proposing to establish a dual language immersion program or developmental bilingual program for English learners in a target language other than Spanish, the department shall provide additional funding of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) over the amount of the grant awarded pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Priority shall be given to proposals for programs with an enrollment that consists of at least 40 percent English
 learners at the elementary level and at least 40 percent English learners and reclassified fluent English proficient pupils at the middle and high school levels.

(b) Both of the following entities are eligible to apply for a grant pursuant to this section:

(1) A school district.

(2) A consortium composed of a school district in partnership with one or more of the following:

(A) Other school districts.

(B) County offices of education.

(C) Bilingual teacher programs in schools of education in institutions of higher education.

(D) Charter schools, other than for-profit charter schools, located within the school district.

(c) In accordance with Section 33444, the department shall identify criteria for evaluating applicants and awarding the grants.

(d) An entity described in subdivision (b) may apply to the department to receive a grant pursuant to subdivision (a). Participation in this grant program shall be on a voluntary basis.

(e) An application shall include a description of all of the following:

(1) The high-quality curriculum and instruction to be provided by the dual language immersion program or developmental bilingual program for English learners.

(2) Projected grade levels, number of school
 districts, number of schoolsites, and number of classrooms proposed in the expansion or establishment of dual language immersion programs or developmental bilingual programs for English learners, for each grant.

(3) The early learning dual language learners program to be provided to dual language learners in early childhood education programs, such as state preschool, the high-quality, standards-based curriculum and instruction, and the projected number of classrooms included for each grant.

(4) Pupil enrollment, disaggregated by English learners, dual language learners, and native speakers of English.

(5) How the program for which the applicant proposes to use the grant will serve the applicant’s English learner population and dual language learners, including outreach to families who speak the target language of
 the new or expanded program.

(6) How the applicant will secure bilingual teachers, bilingual preschool educators, bilingual paraeducators, and bilingual program staff.

(7) How the applicant will sustain its expanded or new dual language immersion program, developmental bilingual program for English learners, or early learning dual language learners program beyond the three-year grant period.

(8) Evidence of support by the applicant school district’s or districts’ county board or boards of education or the governing board or boards of the school district or districts, or the authorizing body or bodies of the charter schools.

(9) Efforts to align program goals with school district responsibilities pursuant to Section 305.

(10) A program budget identifying the amount of funding proposed to be expended for the allowable expenses identified in subdivision (a) of Section 33445, including information on how much grant funding will be spent at each schoolsite.

(11) Available funding within the current or projected budget for the three-year grant period that will be committed in addition to grant funding, including any funding received pursuant to its local control funding formula allocation, federal law, or other sources.

(12) How the applicant will collect data required by the department for purposes of the department’s report described in Section 33446. The application shall include the number of pupils to be served, including English learners, native English speakers, and dual language learners, by the applicant and the number of pupils
 successfully completing programs described in this article at the elementary and secondary levels and in early childhood education programs.

(13) Assurance that the applicant will sustain and maintain the program or programs described in this article and a description of the support, including funding, it commits to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33443.

The department shall perform all of the following functions in the administration of the Pathways to Success Grant Program:

(a) Review applications and award grants.

(b) Provide technical assistance to school districts, county offices of education, or consortia implementing a dual language immersion program, developmental bilingual program for English learners, or early learning dual language learners program.

(c) Identify data to be
 collected by grant recipients.

(d) Identify how it will collect data reported by grant recipients, and how it will make that data available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33444.

The department shall consult with the following persons and entities in the development of the criteria for awarding the grants and in developing the professional development modules:

(a) Professional organizations with demonstrated expertise and experience in developing, implementing, and maintaining a dual language immersion program, developmental bilingual program for English learners, and early learning dual language learners program.

(b) Classroom teachers providing instruction in a dual language immersion program, development bilingual program for English learners, or early learning dual language learners program.

(c) Principals of
 schools with an existing dual language immersion program, development bilingual program for English learners, or early learning dual language learners program.

(d) Researchers and representatives of nonprofit professional organizations with demonstrated expertise and experience specific to dual language immersion programs, developmental bilingual programs for English learners, or early learning dual language learners programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33445.

(a) A grant recipient shall use the grant for any of the following purposes:

(1) School administrator, teacher, and staff training specific to the implementation and maintenance of a dual language immersion program, developmental bilingual program for English learners, or early learning dual language learners program.

(2) Recruitment of bilingual preschool, elementary, and secondary school teachers and paraeducators.

(3) Professional development for teachers after the initial establishment of the program.

(4) Ongoing outreach to families of pupils,
 including strategies for family engagement.

(5) Establishment and support of language learning professional learning communities for teachers.

(6) Instructional coaches with demonstrated expertise and experience in implementing a dual language immersion program, developmental bilingual program for English learners, or early learning dual language learners program.

(7) Standards-based instructional materials in target languages for proposed dual language immersion programs, developmental bilingual programs for English learners, or early learning dual language learners programs.

(b) A grant recipient shall use the grant to supplement funding used for ongoing program costs received pursuant to its local control funding formula allocation and federal funding, such as Title I, II, or III funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33446.

On or before June 30, 2025, the department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature detailing the successes, best practices, barriers or constraints, and outcomes of school district and consortium programs funded with grants pursuant to this article. The report shall include the number of pupils in dual language immersion programs, developmental bilingual programs for English learners, and early learning dual language learners programs, and how these programs supported the goals of each of the school district programs and consortia funded with these grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33447.

This article shall be implemented only upon an appropriation for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Intergenerational Education Programs [33470. - 33473.]

33470.

The State Department of Education shall administer intergenerational education programs in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1592, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

33471.

The State Department of Education shall establish criteria for the allocation of funds to intergenerational education programs. These criteria shall include all of the following:

(a) The programs shall involve persons over 55 years of age in projects with elementary or secondary public school pupils.

(b) The programs shall, when possible, involve creative and innovative approaches to teaching and intergenerational interaction.

(c) The programs may, and are encouraged to, provide a minimum salary or stipend or transportation costs, or both, to participating senior citizens. The programs shall consider financial need of prospective participating senior citizens as one factor in selection, but not necessarily to the exclusion of other factors such as experience or special skills.

(d) The programs shall comply with in-kind services or cash matching requirements established by the State Department of Education.

(e) The programs shall provide evidence of their commitment to procure community, corporate, and other support, including funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1592, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

33471.5.

The State Department of Education may allocate funds pursuant to this article to intergenerational education programs which operate without regard to school district boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1592, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

33472.

The department shall require continuation of contract requirements, such as matching of funds or provision of in-kind services, and any other provisions determined necessary by the department for intergenerational programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

33473.

The State Department of Education may consult with the Department of Aging and the Commission on Aging regarding the criteria for selection of programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1592, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. The California Stem Cell and Biotechnology Education and Workforce Development Act of 2009 [33475. - 33475.5.]

33475.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Stem Cell and Biotechnology Education and Workforce Development Act of 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (SB 471)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33475.1.

The purpose of this article is to establish stem cell and biotechnology education and workforce development as a state priority and to promote stronger links among these industry sectors, the California Institute for Regenerative Medicine, and California public schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (SB 471)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33475.2.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “CIRM” means the California Institute for Regenerative Medicine.

(b) “Department” means the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (SB 471)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33475.3.

The department, in consultation with the CIRM and representatives of the biotechnology industry, shall promote stem cell and biotechnology education and workforce development in the department’s existing programs, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The California Health Science Educators Institute.

(b) The Health Science Capacity Building Project.

(c) The California Partnership Academies, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4.

(d) The regional science resource centers, pursuant to Chapter 3.6
 (commencing with Section 44770) of Part 25 of Division 3.

(e) The California Career Resource Network, including the State Agency Partners Committee.

(f) Multiple pathway programs pursuant to Section 52372.5.

(g) The K-12 High Speed Network, pursuant to Section 11800, including its academic content platform.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (SB 471)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33475.4.

The department shall post on its Internet Web site, and as appropriate, on the Internet Web site created pursuant to Section 52499.66, information and links to information about the following:

(a) Biotechnology education programs, including, but not limited to, those identified by the biotech industry and industry-related organizations.

(b) The CIRM education initiatives and related stem cell education and workforce development programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (SB 471)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33475.5.

The department shall post on its Internet Web site links to the CIRM model curriculum on stem cell science and communicate to science teachers and school districts the availability of this curriculum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (SB 471)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.5. The Eric Paredes Sudden Cardiac Arrest Prevention Act [33479. - 33479.9.]

33479.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Eric Paredes Sudden Cardiac Arrest Prevention Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 33479.9.)
-------------------------------------------

33479.1.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Athletic activity” includes all of the following:

(1) Interscholastic athletics.

(2) An athletic contest or competition, other than interscholastic athletics, that is sponsored by a school, including cheerleading and club-sponsored sports activities.

(3) Noncompetitive cheerleading that is sponsored by a school.

(4) Practices, interscholastic practices, and scrimmages for all of
 the activities listed under paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(b) “Authorized person” means an employee, volunteer, or contractor authorized to provide health or medical services to pupil athletes.

(c) “School” means a public school, including a charter school, or private school that elects to conduct athletic activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 33479.9.)
-------------------------------------------

33479.2.

(a) The department shall post on its Internet Web site guidelines, videos, and an information sheet on sudden cardiac arrest symptoms and warning signs, and other relevant materials to inform and educate pupils and parents, and to train coaches about the nature and warning signs of sudden cardiac arrest, including the risks associated with continuing to play or practice after experiencing fainting or seizures during exercise, unexplained shortness of breath, chest pains, dizziness, racing heart rate, or extreme fatigue.

(b) Materials posted by the department on its Internet Web site may include, but are not necessarily limited to, those developed or used for
 sudden cardiac arrest education and coaches training by the National Federation of High School Associations, the Eric Paredes Save A Life Foundation, or the California Interscholastic Federation.

(c) School districts and schools are encouraged to post on their Internet Web sites the information and material required to be posted by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) to give pupils, parents, and coaches ready access to the information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 33479.9.)
-------------------------------------------

33479.3.

Each school year, before a pupil participates in an athletic activity governed by the California Interscholastic Federation, the school shall collect and retain a copy of the sudden cardiac arrest information sheet required by the California Interscholastic Federation for that pupil. Before a pupil participates in an athletic activity not governed by the California Interscholastic Federation, the pupil and the pupil’s parent or guardian shall sign and return to the pupil’s school an acknowledgment of receipt and review of the information sheet posted on the department’s Internet Web site pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 33479.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 33479.9.)
-------------------------------------------

33479.4.

A school may hold an informational meeting before the start of each athletic season for all ages of competitors regarding the symptoms and warning signs of sudden cardiac arrest. In addition to pupils, parents, coaches, and other school officials, informational meetings may include physicians, pediatric cardiologists, athletic trainers, and authorized persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 33479.9.)
-------------------------------------------

33479.5.

(a) A pupil who passes out or faints while participating in or immediately following an athletic activity, or who is known to have passed out or fainted while participating in or immediately following an athletic activity, shall be removed from participation at that time by the athletic director, coach, athletic trainer, or authorized person.

(b) A pupil who exhibits any of the other symptoms of sudden cardiac arrest, as described in subdivision (a) of Section
 33479.2, during an athletic activity, may be removed from participation by an athletic trainer or authorized person if the athletic trainer or authorized person reasonably believes that the symptoms are cardiac related. In the absence of an athletic trainer or authorized person, any coach who observes any of the symptoms of sudden cardiac arrest shall notify the parent or guardian of the pupil so that the parent or guardian can determine what treatment, if any, the pupil should seek.

(c) A pupil who is removed from play under this section shall not be permitted to return to participate in an athletic activity until the pupil is evaluated and cleared to return to participate in writing by a physician and surgeon, or a nurse practitioner or physician assistant practicing in accordance with standardized procedures or protocols developed by the supervising physician and surgeon and the nurse practitioner or physician assistant, as applicable.

(d) This section does not apply to a pupil engaging in an athletic activity during the regular schoolday or as part of a physical education course required pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 51220 unless it constitutes a practice, interscholastic practice, or scrimmage pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section
 33479.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 33479.9.)
-------------------------------------------

33479.6.

(a) A coach of an athletic activity shall complete the sudden cardiac arrest training course specified in Section 33479.2 and shall retake the training course every two years thereafter.

(b) A coach of an athletic activity shall not be eligible to coach an athletic activity until the coach completes the training course required under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 33479.9.)
-------------------------------------------

33479.7.

On and after July 1, 2019, a coach who violates Section 33479.6 shall be subject to suspension from coaching any athletic activity until completion of the required training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 33479.9.)
-------------------------------------------

33479.8.

The sponsors of youth athletic activities are encouraged to follow the guidelines specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 33479.9.)
-------------------------------------------

33479.9.

This article is operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1639)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: Delayed operative date applies to Article 13.5, commencing with Section 33479.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. State Educational Commissions and Committees [33500. - 33596.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [33500. - 33501.]

33500.

The Legislature hereby declares that there is further need to encourage the adoption of new or improved educational ideas, practices, and techniques in solving critical educational problems in preschool, elementary, and secondary schools throughout the state. In recognition of the need for the planning and developing of new programs involving a wide range of new approaches designed to improve the quality of education available in this state, this chapter is expressly enacted to foster innovation and create change in education, based on research and proven need. It is the purpose of this chapter to bring purposeful change and experimentation to schools throughout the state, through the use of all available resources of the state.

The Legislature further finds that there are in existence a large number of permanent commissions, committees, and councils, some of which have overlapping duties and functions, and some of which have been perpetuated beyond the original need or purpose for which created. In order to provide a more economical, efficient, and logical structure to educational policymaking, it is the intent of the Legislature to create three levels of educational advisory bodies: educational policy advisory commissions, educational advisory committees, and educational task forces.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

33501.

The following definitions apply to educational advisory bodies created by this chapter:

(a) An “educational policy advisory commission” is an advisory body to the state board composed of professional and lay members, as defined by this code. These groups are established to advise the state board within the general policy areas to which they are charged. The Superintendent or the Superintendent’s representative shall serve as executive secretary to each educational policy advisory commission.

(b) An “educational advisory committee” is an advisory body to the Superintendent composed of any combination of educational specialists, technical experts, or specially qualified members of the
 public that is established to advise the Superintendent on the administration of programs with which the Superintendent is charged, and serves at the Superintendent’s pleasure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 22.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Educational Innovation and Planning Commission [33502. - 33522.]

33502.

There is in the state government the Educational Innovation and Planning Commission consisting of a Member of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, a Member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, one public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, one public member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, one public member appointed by the Governor, and 15 public members appointed by the State Board of Education upon the recommendation of the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the members of the State Board of Education.

The 15 public members appointed by the State Board of Education shall be broadly representative of the cultural and educational resources of the state and the public, including at least one individual from each of the following categories:

(a) Classroom teachers at the elementary level.

(b) Classroom teachers at the secondary level.

(c) Principals, superintendents, and other professional employees of local educational agencies and private schools.

(d) Teachers from institutions of higher education.
